Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to ORS 196.566, the  Oregon Ocean Science Trust may create and
maintain an entity that is exempt  from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended, for the purpose of advancing the mission of the trust.
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4097 (HB 4097-INTRO) Page 1